Alaska, session 34, HB309.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 41.23.286 is amended to read: 05 Sec. 41.23.286. Jonesville Public Use Area. Subject to valid existing rights, 06 the vacant and unappropriated state-owned land and water and the state land and water 07 acquired in the future that lie within the following boundaries described in this section 08 are designated as the Jonesville Public Use Area, are reserved for all uses compatible 09 with their primary function as public use land, and are assigned to the department for 10 control and management: 11 (1) Township 19 North, Range 2 East, Seward Meridian 12 Section 1: That portion easterly of Moose Creek 13 Section 12: That portion of N1/2, N1/2SW1/4, and N1/2SE1/4 14 easterly of Moose Creek 01 Section 13: NE1/4, SE1/4NW1/4, and S1/2 02 Section 24: All; 03 (2) Township 19 North, Range 3 East, Seward Meridian 04 Section 2: All 05 Section 3: All 06 Section 4: All 07 Section 5: All 08 Section 6: All 09 Section 7: All 10 Section 8: All 11 Section 9: All 12 Section 10: All 13 Section 11: All 14 Section 14: NE1/4 15 Section 15: N1/2NE1/4 [AND THE NORTH 960 FEET OF 16 THE EAST 1,815 FEET OF THE NW1/4 FOR EACH 17 RECORD OF SURVEY FILED AS 86-85RS P.R.D.] 18 Section 16: All 19 Section 17: All 20 Section 18: All 21 Section 19: NE1/4, E1/2NW1/4, NE1/4SW1/4, NW1/4SE1/4, 22 and Government Lots 1, 2, and 4 23 Section 20: N1/2NE1/4, N1/2NW1/4, and SW1/4NW1/4 24 Section 21: N1/2NW1/4; 25 (3) Township 20 North, Range 2 East, Seward Meridian 26 Section 36: That portion easterly of Moose Creek; 27 (4) Township 20 North, Range 3 East, Seward Meridian 28 Section 31: All 29 Section 32: All 30 Section 33: All 31 Section 34: All 01 Section 35: All. 02 * Sec. 2. This Act takes effect immediately under AS 01.10.070(c). Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.